Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
PART 1 CORRECTIONS ADMINISTRATION
17-1-113.7. Prohibition against the use of restraints on pregnant inmates in the custody of correctional facilities and private contract prisons - report.

The staff of a correctional facility or private contract prison, when restraining a female inmate, shall use the least restrictive restraints necessary to ensure safety if the staff of the correctional facility or private contract prison have actual knowledge or a reasonable belief that the inmate is pregnant. The requirement that staff use the least restrictive restraints necessary to ensure safety shall continue during postpartum recovery and transport to or from a correctional facility and private contract prison.

Staff of a correctional facility, private contract prison, or medical facility shall not use restraints of any kind on a pregnant inmate during labor and delivery of the child; except that staff may use restraints if:
(2) (a) (I) Staff of a correctional facility, private contract prison, or medical facility shall not use restraints of any kind on a pregnant inmate during labor and delivery of the child; except that staff may use restraints if:

The medical staff determine that restraints are medically necessary for safe childbirth;

The prison staff or medical staff determine that the inmate presents an immediate and serious risk of harm to herself, to other patients, or to medical staff; or

The warden or his or her designee determines that the inmate poses a substantial risk of escape that cannot reasonably be reduced by the use of other existing means.

Notwithstanding any provision of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) to the contrary, under no circumstances shall staff use leg shackles or waist restraints on an inmate during labor and delivery of the child, postpartum recovery while in a medical facility, or transport to or from a medical facility for childbirth.

The correctional facility, private contract prison, or medical facility staff authorizing the use of restraints on a pregnant inmate during labor or delivery of the child shall make a written record of the use of the restraints, which record shall include, at a minimum, the type of restraint used, the circumstances that necessitated the use of the restraint, and the length of time the restraint was used. The staff of the correctional facility or private contract prison shall retain the record for a minimum of five years and shall make the record available for public inspection with individually identifying information redacted from the record unless the inmate who is the subject of the record gives prior written consent for the public release of the record. The written record of the use of restraint shall not constitute a medical record under state or federal law. Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), no later than February 15, 2022, and each February 15 thereafter, the warden of the private contract prison and the executive director or the executive director's designee shall submit the records created pursuant to this subsection (2)(b) in the prior calendar year to the judiciary committees of the senate and house of representatives, or their successor committees.

Upon return to a correctional facility or private contract prison after childbirth, the inmate shall be entitled to have a member of the correctional facility's or private contract prison's medical staff present during any strip search.

When an inmate's pregnancy is determined, the staff of a correctional facility or private contract prison shall inform a pregnant inmate in writing in a language and in a manner understandable to the inmate of the provisions of this section concerning the use of restraints and the presence of medical staff during a strip search.

The executive director of the department of corrections shall ensure that the staff of the department of corrections and of private contract prisons receive adequate training concerning the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-193), ch. 312, p. 1463, § 1, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2021:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 21-193), ch. 433, p. 2859, § 3, effective September 7.

17-1-113.8. Persons with serious behavioral or mental health disorders - long-term isolated confinement - work group - medication-assisted treatment - appropriation - repeal.

The department shall not place a person with a behavioral or serious mental health disorder in long-term isolated confinement except when exigent circumstances are present.

There is hereby established within the department a serious mental illness in long-term isolated confinement work group, referred to in this section as the "work group". The work group consists of:

The deputy executive director of the department, or his or her designee, who shall convene and serve as the chair of the work group;

The director of clinical and correctional services, within the department, or his or her designee;

The director of prisons, within the department, or his or her designee;

The chief of psychiatry, within the department, or his or her designee;

The director of behavioral health, within the department, or his or her designee;

Two representatives from a nonprofit prisoners' rights advocacy group, one who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one who is appointed by the president of the senate; and

Two mental health professionals independent from the department with particular knowledge of prisons and conditions of confinement, one who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one who is appointed by the president of the senate.

The work group shall advise the department on policies and procedures related to the proper treatment and care of offenders with serious behavioral or mental health disorders in long-term isolated confinement, with a focus on persons with serious behavioral or mental health disorders in long-term isolated confinement.

The work group has the power to request, on a periodic basis, information and data from the department on the status of the department's work on the subject matter of the work group.

The chair of the work group shall convene the work group's first meeting no later than July 1, 2014, and the work group must meet at least semi-annually thereafter. The chair shall schedule and convene the work group's meetings.

The chair shall provide the work group with quarterly updates on the department's policies related to the work group's subject area.

The department shall allow medication-assisted treatment, as it is defined in section 23-21-803, to be provided to individuals who are placed in the custody of the department who were receiving such treatment in a local jail prior to being placed in the custody of the department.

The department may enter into agreements with community agencies, behavioral health organizations, and substance use disorder treatment organizations to assist in the development and administration of medication-assisted treatment pursuant to this section.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate three million dollars from the behavioral and mental health cash fund created in section 24-75-230 to the department to provide medication-assisted treatment to individuals who are placed in the custody of the department. Any unexpended or unencumbered money appropriated pursuant to this subsection (4)(a) remains available for expenditure for the same purpose in the 2023-24 state fiscal year without further appropriation.

The department shall use money appropriated pursuant to this subsection (4) for:

Hardware, software, and infrastructure, including renovations, necessary to store medications at department facilities;

Providing continuity of care for inmates with a substance use disorder between the institutional settings, including probation, and community-based treatment centers in order to mitigate the illness and suffering surrounding the acute withdrawal of individuals with a substance use disorder; and

Facilitating the long-term treatment and recovery of individuals upon release.

This subsection (4) is repealed, effective June 30, 2024.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (SB 14-064), ch. 349, p. 1567, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 2017:

(1) and (2)(b)(I) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1302, § 129, effective May 25.

L. 2019:

(3) added, (SB 19-008), ch. 275, p. 2594, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

(4) added, (SB 22-196), ch. 193, p. 1290, § 3, effective May 19.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017. For the legislative declaration in SB 22-196, see section 1 of chapter 193, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

17-1-113.9. Use of administrative segregation for state inmates - reporting.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before January 1, 2012, and each January 1 thereafter, the executive director shall provide a written report to the judiciary committees of the senate and house of representatives, or any successor committees, concerning the status of administrative segregation; reclassification efforts for offenders with mental health disorders or intellectual and developmental disabilities, including duration of stay, reason for placement, and number and percentage discharged; and any internal reform efforts since July 1, 2011.

Any cost savings achieved as a result of the implementation of sections 17-22.5-302 (1.3) and 17-22.5-405 (8) shall be appropriated and redirected to the department to support behavior-modification programs, incentive programs, mental health services or programs, or similar efforts designed as viable alternatives to administrative segregation.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (SB 11-176), ch. 289, p. 1342, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-031), ch. 92, p. 280, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (SB 18-091), ch. 35, p. 385, § 15, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-091, see section 1 of chapter 35, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

17-1-114. Pool of funds - continuance of community supervision.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a fund to be known as the community supervision supplemental fund, which shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly. All moneys in the fund shall be subject to withdrawal by the department of corrections, the judicial department, or the department of public safety for the purpose of continuing community supervision, such as parole supervision, probation supervision, community corrections programs, or home electronic monitoring over offenders who would otherwise be removed to secure custody due to lack of resources. Such moneys may be withdrawn upon a request by the department of corrections, the judicial department, or the department of public safety which is made to the director of the office of state planning and budgeting. The director of the office of state planning and budgeting, in consultation with the joint budget committee, shall approve or disapprove the request made by each department and budget the amount of such request. Any withdrawal approved by the director of the office of state planning and budgeting shall be dispersed to the department making the request.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 944, § 13, effective June 7.

17-1-114.5. Incarceration of a person in custody with the capacity for pregnancy - report.

A correctional facility or private contract prison incarcerating a person who is capable of pregnancy shall:

Train the facility's staff to ensure that a pregnant person receives safe and respectful treatment;

Develop administrative policies to ensure a trauma-informed standard of care is integrated with current practices to promote the health and safety of a pregnant person;

Provide each pregnant person, during the person's pregnancy and through the person's postpartum period, with access to:

Perinatal health-care providers with perinatal experience; and

Healthy foods and information on nutrition, recommended activity levels, safety measures, and supplies, including menstrual products as required in section 17-1-113.6, and breast pumps approved by the executive director or the executive director's designee;

Provide counseling and treatment for pregnant people who have suffered from:

A diagnosed behavioral, mental health, or substance use disorder;

Trauma or violence, including domestic violence;

Human immunodeficiency virus;

Sexual abuse;

Pregnancy loss or infant loss; or

Chronic conditions;

Provide evidence-based pregnancy and childbirth education, parenting support, and other relevant forms of health literacy;

Develop administrative policies to identify and offer opportunities for postpartum persons to maintain contact with the person's newborn child to promote bonding, including enhanced visitation policies, access to prison nursery programs, and breastfeeding support, when appropriate;

In accordance with the requirements of the federal "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996", as amended, Pub.L. 104-191, transfer health records to community providers if a pregnant person exits the criminal justice system during the person's pregnancy or during the person's postpartum period;

Connect a person exiting the criminal justice system during the person's pregnancy or postpartum period to community-based resources, such as referrals to health-care providers, substance use disorder treatment, and social services that address social determinants of maternal health;

Establish partnerships with local public entities, private community entities, community-based organizations, Indian tribes and tribal organizations as defined in the federal "Indian Self-Determination and Education Assistance Act", 25 U.S.C. sec. 5304, as amended, or urban Indian organizations as defined in the federal "Indian Health Care Improvement Act", 25 U.S.C. sec. 1603, as amended; and

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), by February 15, 2022, and by February 15 each year thereafter, report to the judiciary committees of the senate and house of representatives, or their successor committees, on the number of births by pregnant people who are in the custody of the facility, including the location of the births, that occurred in the prior calendar year.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-193), ch. 433, p. 2860, § 4, effective September 7.

17-1-115. Investigators employed by the department - notification to local law enforcement agencies. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 432, § 2, effective April 23.

L. 99:

Entire section repealed, p. 424, § 3, effective April 30.

17-1-115.2. Correctional law enforcement agencies to provide identification cards to retired peace officers upon request - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Law enforcement agency of the department" means the department and any agency within the department that employs at least one peace officer.

"Peace officer" means a certified peace officer described in section 16-2.5-102, C.R.S.

"Photographic identification" means a photographic identification that satisfies the description at 18 U.S.C. sec. 926C (d).

Except as described in subsection (3) of this section, on and after August 7, 2013, if a law enforcement agency of the department has a policy, on August 7, 2013, of issuing photographic identification to peace officers who have retired from the agency, and the agency discontinues said policy after August 7, 2013, the agency shall continue to provide such photographic identification to peace officers who have retired from the agency if:

The peace officer requests the identification;

The peace officer retired from the law enforcement agency before the date upon which the agency discontinued the policy; and

The peace officer is a qualified retired law enforcement officer, as defined in 18 U.S.C. sec. 926C (c).

Before issuing or renewing a photographic identification to a retired law enforcement officer pursuant to this section, a law enforcement agency of the state shall complete a criminal background check of the officer through a search of the national instant criminal background check system created by the federal "Brady Handgun Violence Prevention Act" (Pub.L. 103-159), the relevant portion of which is codified at 18 U.S.C. sec. 922 (t), and a search of the state integrated criminal justice information system. If the background check indicates that the officer is prohibited from possessing a firearm by state or federal law, the law enforcement agency shall not issue the photographic identification.

A law enforcement agency of the department may charge a fee for issuing a photographic identification to a retired peace officer pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, which fee shall not exceed the direct and indirect costs assumed by the agency in issuing the photographic identification.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, a law enforcement agency of the department shall not be required to issue a photographic identification to a particular peace officer if the chief administrative officer of the agency elects not to do so.

If a law enforcement agency of the department denies a photographic identification to a retired peace officer who requests a photographic identification pursuant to this section, the law enforcement agency shall provide the retired peace officer a written statement setting forth the reason for the denial.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1118), ch. 81, p. 262, § 6, effective August 7.

17-1-115.5. Prison sexual assault prevention program.

The department shall develop, with respect to sexual assaults that occur in correctional facilities operated by or pursuant to a contract with the department, policies and procedures to:

Require disciplinary action for employees who fail to report incidences of sexual assault to the inspector general appointed pursuant to section 17-1-103.8;

Require the inspector general or the department of corrections investigator, whichever is appropriate, after completing an investigation for sexual assault, to submit the findings to the district attorney with jurisdiction over the facility in which the alleged sexual assault occurred;

Prohibit retaliation and disincentives for reporting sexual assaults;

Provide, in situations in which there is reason to believe that a sexual assault has occurred, reasonable and appropriate measures to ensure victim safety by separating the victim from the assailant, if known;

Ensure the confidentiality of prison rape complaints and protection of inmates who make complaints of prison rape;

Provide acute trauma care for sexual assault victims, including treatment of injuries, HIV prophylaxis measures, and testing for sexually transmitted infections;

Provide, at intake and periodically thereafter, department-approved, easy-to-understand information developed by the department on sexual assault prevention, treatment, reporting, and counseling in consultation with community groups with expertise in sexual assault prevention, treatment, reporting, and counseling;

Provide sexual-assault-specific training to department mental health professionals and all employees who have direct contact with inmates regarding treatment and methods of prevention and investigation;

Provide confidential mental health counseling for victims of sexual assault;

Monitor victims of sexual assault for suicidal impulses, post-traumatic stress disorder, depression, and other mental health consequences resulting from the sexual assault; and

Require termination of an employee who engages in a sexual assault on or sexual conduct with an inmate consistent with constitutional due process protections and state personnel laws and rules.

Investigation of a sexual assault shall be conducted by investigators trained in the investigation of sex crimes. The investigation shall include, but need not be limited to, use of forensic rape kits, questioning of suspects and witnesses, and gathering and preserving relevant evidence.

The department shall annually report the data that it is required to compile and report to the federal bureau of justice statistics as required by the federal "Prison Rape Elimination Act of 2003", Pub.L. 108-79, as amended, to the judiciary committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1545, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2008:

(1)(b) amended, p. 466, § 2, effective April 14; (3) amended, p. 1885, § 26, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(1)(f) amended, (SB 16-146), ch. 230, p. 915, § 7, effective July 1.

17-1-115.7. Prevention of sexual assaults on youthful inmates - compliance with federal law - report - definition.

On or before August 20, 2013, the department shall implement policies pursuant to the federal "Prison Rape Elimination Act of 2003", 42 U.S.C. sec. 15601 et seq., to ensure compliance with the provisions thereof relating to youthful inmates, as codified at 28 CFR 115.14.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before October 1, 2013, and on or before each October 1 thereafter, the department shall report to the judiciary committees of the house of representatives and senate, or any successor committees, concerning the implementation of the policies described in subsection (1) of this section within the youth offender system described in section 18-1.3-407.5.

As used in this section, "youthful inmate" means any person less than eighteen years of age who is under adult court supervision and incarcerated or detained in a correctional facility.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-216), ch. 171, p. 618, § 2, effective May 10.

L. 2017:

(2) amended, (SB 17-031), ch. 92, p. 281, § 3, effective August 9.

17-1-115.8. Corrections officer staffing - report - double shift criteria - definition.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the department shall prepare a report for the members of the general assembly by January 15, 2014, and by January 15 each year thereafter, regarding corrections officer staffing levels. The report must include:

Staffing levels for corrections officers at each correctional facility and private contract prison in Colorado;

Staffing levels for corrections officers for each correctional facility security level; and

A comparison of staffing levels at Colorado correctional facilities and the national standards adopted by the national institute of corrections and the American correctional association.

The department shall develop criteria for when a corrections officer may work two consecutive shifts, and the criteria must apply to a seven-day period and must account for different security-level facilities.

The department, through discussions with employees, shall establish work period and compensation practices that comply with the following standards that:

A work period for correctional officers may be from seven consecutive days to fourteen consecutive days in length. Overtime pay for correctional officers must be required when the number of hours worked exceeds the number of hours that bears the same relationship to eighty-five hours in a fourteen-day period.

Corrections officers who work twelve or more hours in one twenty-four hour period shall be paid the amount of one and one-half times their regular rate of pay for the time they worked that exceeded eight and one-half hours;

All department employees receive with their pay check a pay stub that clearly and accurately reflects all hours worked, standard rate of pay, rate of overtime pay, accrual of any paid leave and compensatory time, remaining paid leave, and compensatory time balances;

The department shall establish administrative regulation practices that create greater flexibility in the staffing of facilities, including but not limited to employee shift substitution, voluntary overtime lists, roving, and pool staff coverage; and

All practices must be compliant with federal wage and hour law.

For purposes of this section, "corrections officer" means an employee of the department of corrections who is subject to the exemption in 29 U.S.C. sec. 207 (k); except that it does not include a parole officer.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added (SB 13-210), ch. 261, p. 1377, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

IP(1) amended, (SB 17-031), ch. 92, p. 281, § 4, effective August 9.

17-1-115.9. Incentives for mental health professionals - report - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that:

The failure to provide timely needed sex offender treatment or services creates a risk when an inmate is released into the community and increases expenses when an inmate remains in prison due to his or her failure to receive treatment or services; and

In order to provide the necessary sex offender treatment and services in difficult-to-serve areas in a timely manner, the department must have the flexibility to offer incentives to contracted mental health professionals to provide such treatment and services in such areas.

The department shall monitor the number of inmates who have a specified sex offender treatment or service identified in the inmate's recommended rehabilitation report and who are not receiving the treatment or service due to a lack of treatment or service providers. The department shall develop and may implement an incentive plan for each sex offender treatment or service and each geographic area in which there is a need for additional contracted mental health professionals to provide the identified sex offender treatment or service. The incentive plan must include specific incentives to contract with the necessary mental health professionals and may include increases in fees and travel reimbursements paid, bonuses, and other financial incentives.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11), on or before December 1, 2018, and each December 1 thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the joint budget committee that must include:

The statewide number of inmates requiring each sex offender treatment or service provided by a mental health professional and the number of inmates unable to receive such treatment or service; and

For each incentive plan developed pursuant to this section, the number of inmates requiring the treatment or service, the number of inmates still unable to receive the treatment or service, a description of the incentive plan developed, and a report on the effectiveness of any incentive offered by the department under the plan.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1040), ch. 199, p. 1295, § 1, effective August 8.

17-1-116. Corrections expansion reserve fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the corrections expansion reserve fund. Moneys in the fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the purpose of complying with the provisions of section 2-2-703, C.R.S., which requires that any bill which results in a net increase in periods of imprisonment in state correctional facilities provide for the funding of any increased capital construction costs or increased operating costs associated therewith. Any unexpended or unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not revert to or be transferred to the general fund or any other fund of the state.

Source:

L. 93, 1st Ex. Sess.:

Entire section added, p. 8, § 10, effective September 13.

17-1-117. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 94-1052. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1345, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 837, § 17, effective May 24.

17-1-118. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 96-1361. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1335, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1885, § 27, effective August 5.

17-1-119. Lethal perimeter security systems for correctional facilities - governmental immunity - limitations.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the installation and operation of electrified, lethal perimeter security systems at certain state correctional facilities will enhance the safety of the citizens of this state and will result in reduced costs for operating such correctional facilities.

The department is authorized, through its agents and contractors, to design and construct electrified, lethal perimeter security systems at correctional facilities to be managed, operated, supervised, and controlled by the department if the department determines the use of such security systems to be necessary and appropriate.

The department, any agent of the department, or contractor hired by the department for the design and construction of an electrified, lethal perimeter security system at a state correctional facility shall be provided all protections of governmental immunity provided to public employees by article 10 of title 24, C.R.S., including but not limited to the payment of judgments and settlements, the provision of legal defense, and the payment of costs incurred in court actions in regard to any and all claims arising from the design and construction, consistent with the design approved by the department, of the lethal aspect of such security system.

The provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall be construed as a specific exception for independent contractors hired to design and construct electrified, lethal perimeter security systems at state correctional facilities from the general exclusion of independent contractors from the protections of governmental immunity provided in article 10 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1587, § 3, effective June 4.

17-1-119.5. Compilation of data related to inmates with children attending school.

The department of corrections shall obtain information from each inmate concerning whether the inmate is the parent of a child who is under the age of eighteen in the state of Colorado and, if so, whether the child is enrolled in a school in the state and the school district or state charter school in which the child is enrolled. In the process of obtaining the information from the inmate, the department shall not provide the inmate with information that would pose a safety threat to the child or child's family.

The department shall collect and compile information related to programs that assist students whose parents are incarcerated.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 951, § 1, effective June 2.

17-1-119.7. Prison population management measures.

The department shall track the prison bed vacancy rate in both correctional facilities and state-funded private contract prison beds on a monthly basis. If the vacancy rate falls below three percent for thirty consecutive days, the department shall notify the governor, the joint budget committee, the parole board, each elected district attorney, the chief judge of each judicial district, the state public defender, and the office of community corrections in the department of public safety. The department shall notify the governor, the joint budget committee, the parole board, each elected district attorney, the chief judge of each judicial district, the state public defender, and the office of community corrections once the vacancy rate exceeds four percent for thirty consecutive days.

If the vacancy rate in correctional facilities and state-funded private contract prison beds falls below three percent for thirty consecutive days, the department shall:

Request the office of community corrections to provide the department with information regarding the location and nature of any unutilized community corrections beds. The office of community corrections shall provide the information within seventy-two hours of the request and on a weekly basis until the office of community corrections receives notification that the vacancy rate exceeds three percent.

Request that the parole board review a list of inmates who are within ninety days of their mandatory release date, have an approved parole plan, and do not require full board review or victim notification pursuant to section 24-4.1-302.5 (1)(j);

Coordinate with the parole board to review the list of inmates who have satisfied conditions for conditional release verified by the department of corrections, do not require full board review or victim notification pursuant to section 24-4.1-302.5 (1)(j), and have satisfied the condition or conditions required for an order to parole; and

Submit to the parole board a list of eligible inmates with a favorable parole plan who have been assessed to be medium or lower risk on the validated risk assessment scale developed pursuant to section 17-22.5-404 (2). Except as provided in subsection (2)(a)(IV)(B) of this section, the parole board shall conduct a file review of each inmate on the list and set conditions of release for the inmate within thirty days after receipt of the list and set a day of release no later than thirty days after conducting the file review.

If victim notification is required and a victim wishes to provide input, the parole board shall schedule a hearing in lieu of a file review and set conditions of release for the inmate and a date of release no later than thirty days after conducting the hearing.

If additional information is needed, the parole board may table a decision after the file review or hearing and request additional information from the department. The parole board may grant or deny parole to an applicant, and, if the decision is to deny parole, it must be based on a majority vote of the full board.

An inmate is not eligible for release pursuant to this section if he or she is serving a sentence for an offense enumerated in section 24-4.1-302 or section 16-22-102 (9) or has had a class I code of penal discipline violation within the previous twelve months from the date of the list or since incarceration, whichever is shorter; has been terminated for lack of progress or declined in writing to participate in programs that have been recommended and made available to the inmate within the previous twelve months or since incarceration, whichever is shorter; has been regressed from community corrections or revoked from parole within the previous one hundred eighty days; or has a pending felony charge, detainer, or an extraditable warrant.

An inmate is eligible for release pursuant to this subsection (2)(a)(IV) if the inmate is at or past his or her parole eligibility date and is only serving a sentence for a conviction of a level 3 or level 4 drug felony or a class 3, class 4, class 5, or class 6 nonviolent felony offense.

The department may utilize any, all, or a combination of the measures described in subsection (2)(a) of this section when the vacancy rate falls below two percent for thirty consecutive days and until the vacancy rate is above three percent for thirty consecutive days.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1410), ch. 394, p. 2352, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 2019:

(1), IP(2)(a), (2)(a)(II), and (2)(a)(III) amended and (2)(a)(IV) added, (SB 19-143), ch. 286, p. 2655, § 1, effective May 28.

17-1-120. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 97-1077 and HB 97-1060. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1549, § 26, effective July 1; entire section added, p. 992, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1885, § 27, effective August 5.

17-1-121. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 97-1186. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1592, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1885, § 27, effective August 5.

17-1-122. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 98-1160. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 1448, § 42, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(c)(I) repealed, p. 675, § 2, effective May 28.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1885, § 27, effective August 5.

17-1-123. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 98-1156. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 1294, § 16, effective November 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(e) repealed, p. 675, § 3, effective May 28.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1885, § 27, effective August 5.

17-1-124. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - SB 98-021. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 1265, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(d)(I) repealed, p. 675, § 4, effective May 28.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1885, § 27, effective August 5.

17-1-125. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 99-1068. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 661, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1885, § 27, effective August 5.

17-1-126. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 00-1247. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 643, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(c)(I) repealed, p. 676, § 5, effective May 28.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1885, § 27, effective August 5.

17-1-127. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 00-1158. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1014, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1885, § 27, effective August 5.

17-1-128. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 00-1111. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 648, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1885, § 27, effective August 5.

17-1-129. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 00-1214. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 638, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(c)(I) repealed, p. 676, § 6, effective May 28.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1885, § 27, effective August 5.

17-1-130. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 00-1201. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 635, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(c)(I) repealed, p. 676, § 7, effective May 28.

L. 2004:

(1)(e)(I) repealed, p. 686, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1885, § 27, effective August 5.

17-1-131. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 00-1317. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 928, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1885, § 27, effective August 5.

17-1-132. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 00-1107. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 712, § 50, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(c)(I) repealed, p. 677, § 8, effective May 28.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1885, § 27, effective August 5.

17-1-133. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 01-1205. (Repealed)

Source: L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 527, § 3, effective May 22.

L. 2002:

(1)(a) repealed, p. 677, § 9, effective May 28.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1885, § 27, effective August 5.

17-1-134. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - SB 01-046. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 606, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1885, § 27, effective August 5.

17-1-135. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 01-1204. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 1010, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(a) repealed, p. 1470, § 3, effective May 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1885, § 27, effective August 5.

17-1-136. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - SB 01-210. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 568, § 6, effective May 29.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1885, § 27, effective August 5.